Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

Licensing

7-62-101. Types of buildings defined.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assembly building” means a building where a number of persons congregate for amusement, civic, educational, recreational, religious or social purposes;

“Commercial building” means a building used for the conduct of a business, having financial profit as the primary aim; and

“Residential building” means a house or building used or designed to be used as the abode or home of a person, family or household exclusively as a residence.

Acts 1963, ch. 317, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-735.

Attorney General Opinions. Monetary limitations in Tennessee Contractor's Liability Act, OAG 93-12, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/11/93).

7-62-102. Residential builders or contractors construed.

“Residential builder” or “residential maintenance and alteration contractor” shall be construed to mean any person, firm or corporation who, for a fixed sum, price, percentage, consideration or other compensation other than wages, contracts with another for the erection, construction, repair, replacement, alteration or addition to, subtraction from or demolition of a residential or residential-commercial combination building.

Acts 1963, ch. 317, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-736.

7-62-103. Authorization to require licensing.

The several cities, towns and counties of this state are hereby authorized and empowered to enact laws or ordinances to safeguard and protect the home owner or prospective home owner, commercial property owner or assembly building property owner, by requiring the licensing of the residential, commercial or assembly builders and residential, commercial and assembly maintenance and alteration contractors as defined in §7-62-102 in accordance with the provisions set forth in such law or ordinance.

Acts 1963, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-734.

7-62-104. Exceptions from licensing requirements.

This chapter shall not apply to:

An authorized representative of the United States government, the state of Tennessee or any county, city, town or other political subdivision of this state;

Owners of property with reference to structures on the property for their own use and occupancy;

Officers of courts acting within the terms of their office;

Any person who shall engage or be engaged solely in the business of performing work and services under contract with a builder under this chapter;

The sale of any products or materials or the sale or the installation of articles of merchandise that are not actually fabricated into and do not become a permanently fixed part of the structure;

Any work or operation on one (1) undertaking or project or one (1) or more contracts, the aggregate contract price for which labor, materials and all other items is less than one hundred dollars ($100), such work or operations being considered as a casual, minor or inconsequential nature. This exemption does not apply in any case wherein the work or construction is only part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same or a different residential, commercial or assembly builder or residential, commercial or assembly maintenance and alteration contractor, or in which a division of the operation is made in contracts of amounts of less than one hundred dollars ($100) for the purpose of evasion of this chapter; or

Any contractor licensed and qualified under the state contractors' laws.

Acts 1963, ch. 317, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-737.

Cross-References. Licensing of contractors, §62-6-111.

7-62-105. Licensing by building department — Performance bond — Revocation or suspension — Hearing — Appeal.

Provision shall be made for licensing the residential, commercial and assembly builders and residential, commercial and assembly maintenance and alteration contractors with the building department of the town, city or county by law or ordinance, providing for the identification of the party, for a license fee and renewal of same, for a performance bond in such amount as the city or county may determine, for the revocation or suspension of licenses after proper hearing before an appeal board of private citizens, and for further appeal to the governing body of the town, city or county.

Acts 1963, ch. 317, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-738.

Cross-References. Bond requirements for unlicensed contractors, §7-62-203.

Unlicensed contractors, limit on building permits, §7-62-202.

7-62-106. Administration of licensing provisions.

The law or ordinance may provide for the administration of same under a board that may be established or under a proper officer of the governing body.

Acts 1963, ch. 317, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-739.

7-62-107. Unlicensed acts — Misdemeanors — Nuisance.

Provision may be made that no person, firm, partnership or corporation shall attempt to do any of the matters set forth in § 7-62-102, unless duly licensed and, if not licensed, such person or entity shall be punished for violation of the law or ordinance as a Class C misdemeanor.

Continuing or aggravating violations may constitute a nuisance and be punishable as such.

Acts 1963, ch. 317, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-740; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Abatement of nuisances, title 29, ch. 3.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.